Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-2779
Income tax;
notice of Tax Commissioner's determination; mailing; contents.

Notice of the Tax Commissioner's determination shall be mailed
to the taxpayer and such notice shall set forth briefly the
Tax Commissioner's findings of fact and the basis of decision in each case
decided in whole or in part adversely to the taxpayer.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 79, p. 1605;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 42.